Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1586.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 315.518 is amended to read:
315.518. (1) As used in this section[,]:
(a) “Qualified alternative energy production company” means an entity whose primary
business is to research, develop and manufacture devices that enable energy to be produced
from renewable sources.
(b) “Qualified biotechnology company” means an entity whose primary business is the
use of cellular or biological processes to research, develop and manufacture new medicines
or technologies to cure life-threatening diseases and illnesses.
(c) “Qualified company” means a qualified alternative energy production company, a
qualified biotechnology company or a qualified semiconductor company.
(d) “Qualified semiconductor company” means an entity whose primary business is the research,
design, development, fabrication, assembly, testing, packaging or validation of semiconductors, or
an entity whose primary business is the creation of semiconductor manufacturing equipment, semi-
conductor core intellectual property or electronic design automation software that is primarily in-
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 237

SB 1586
tended for use in the semiconductor industry.
(2) A credit against taxes otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 or, if the taxpayer is a corpo-
ration, under ORS chapter 317 shall be allowed to eligible taxpayers for increases in qualified re-
search expenses and basic research payments. The credit shall be determined in accordance with
section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as follows:
(a) The applicable percentage specified in section 41(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be
15 percent.
(b) “Qualified research” and “basic research” shall consist only of research conducted in Oregon
by a qualified [semiconductor] company, in support of [a trade or business directly related to semi-
conductors] the qualified company’s primary business.
(3) The Income Tax Regulations as prescribed by the Secretary of the Treasury under authority
of section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code apply for purposes of this section, except as modified by
this section or as provided in rules adopted by the Department of Revenue.
(4) The maximum credit under this section may not exceed $4 million for any taxpayer.
(5) Prior to claiming a credit under this section, a taxpayer must obtain from the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department[:]
[(a) If applicable, approval from the Oregon Business Development Department as provided in
section 5, chapter 298, Oregon Laws 2023.]
[(b)] certification as provided in ORS 315.522.
(6) The Oregon Business Development Department shall provide information to the Department
of Revenue about all certifications issued under ORS 315.522, if required by ORS 315.058.
(7) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department may order the suspension or
revocation of a credit allowed under this section, as provided in ORS 315.061.
(8) A deduction may not be taken for the portion of expenses or payments, otherwise allowable
as a deduction, that is equal to the amount of the credit claimed under this section.
(9) Notwithstanding ORS 317.090 (3), the refundable portion of a credit under this section is al-
lowed against the tax imposed under ORS 317.090 and may reduce the tax imposed under ORS
317.090 to zero. Any remaining amount of credit above the minimum shall be refunded as provided
in ORS 315.519.
(10) Any tax credit that is otherwise allowable under this section and that is not used by the
taxpayer in that year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability for the
next succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused in such next succeeding tax year may be
carried forward and used in the second succeeding tax year, and likewise any credit not used in that
second succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the third succeeding tax year, and
any credit not used in that third succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the fourth
succeeding tax year, and any credit not used in that fourth succeeding tax year may be carried
forward and used in the fifth succeeding tax year, but may not be carried forward for any tax year
thereafter.
SECTION 2. ORS 315.519 is amended to read:
315.519. (1)(a) If the amount allowable as a credit under ORS 315.518, after any reduction ap-
plicable under subsection (2) of this section, when added to the sum of the amount of estimated tax
paid under ORS 314.515 and any other tax prepayment amounts, exceeds the taxes imposed by ORS
chapters 314 and 317 for the tax year after application of any nonrefundable credits allowable for
purposes of ORS chapter 317 for the tax year, the amount of the excess determined under this sub-
section shall be refunded to the taxpayer as provided in ORS 314.415.
[2]

SB 1586
(b) If the amount allowable as a credit under ORS 315.518, after any reduction applicable under
subsection (2) of this section, when added to the sum of the amounts allowable as payment of tax
under ORS 316.187 or 316.583, other tax prepayment amounts and other refundable credit amounts,
exceeds the taxes imposed by ORS chapters 314 and 316 for the tax year after application of any
nonrefundable credits allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 316 for the tax year, the amount of the
excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer as provided in ORS 316.502.
(2) If the taxpayer employs, in Oregon:
(a) Fewer than 150 employees at the close of the tax year, the amount of credit used in the
calculation in subsection (1) of this section shall be reduced by 25 percent.
(b) At least 150 employees but fewer than 500 employees at the close of the tax year, the amount
of credit used in the calculation in subsection (1) of this section shall be reduced by 50 percent.
(c) At least 500 employees [but fewer than 3,000 employees] at the close of the tax year, the
amount of credit used in the calculation in subsection (1) of this section shall be reduced by 75
percent.
(3) Any amount not available for refund due to subsection (2) of this section may be carried
forward as provided in ORS 315.518 (10).
[(4) This section applies only to taxpayers with fewer than 3,000 employees who are employed in
Oregon at the close of the tax year.]
SECTION 3. ORS 315.522 is amended to read:
315.522. (1) A taxpayer seeking to claim the credit provided under ORS 315.518 shall file for
each tax year a written application for certification with the Oregon Business Development De-
partment. The application must include:
(a) A description of how the taxpayer meets the definition of a qualified [semiconductor] company
under ORS 315.518;
(b) A description of how proposed research and development activities for which the taxpayer
seeks a tax credit under ORS 315.518 will support the taxpayer in conducting [a business or trade
directly related to semiconductors] the qualified company’s primary business; and
(c) Any other information that is required by the department by rule.
(2) An application for certification under this section must be accompanied by a payment of any
fee established by the department by rule under subsection (4) of this section.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the department shall certify
applicants and award credit amounts in the order applications are received by the depart-
ment. Applications received on the same day shall be deemed to have been received simul-
taneously. If a pending request cannot be fully certified because of the limitation in section
8, chapter 298, Oregon Laws 2023, the department shall certify the portion that may be cer-
tified unless the qualified company elects to withdraw its request rather than receive partial
credit.
(b) The department by rule shall establish a reserve amount sufficient to ensure that any
qualified company with fewer than 150 employees that files an application under this section
prior to the date prescribed for filing the qualified company’s tax return shall receive certi-
fication for the full amount of the credit to which the qualified company is eligible.
[(3)] (c) After considering timely filed and complete applications, along with amounts available
under section 8, chapter 298, Oregon Laws 2023, the department shall, if the department deems ap-
propriate, issue a certification to an applicant taxpayer if the department determines that the tax-
payer is a qualified [semiconductor] company as that term is defined under ORS 315.518, and if the
[3]

SB 1586
taxpayer attests that the proposed research and development activities for which the taxpayer seeks
the credit under ORS 315.518 will support the taxpayer in conducting [a trade or business directly
related to semiconductors] the taxpayer’s primary business.
(4) The department shall establish by rule a fee for filing a written application for certification
under this section. The fee shall be adequate to recover the costs incurred by the department in
reviewing the applications under this section.
(5) Information submitted to the department under this section or section 5, chapter 298, Oregon
Laws 2023, is exempt from public disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478 and must be treated as
confidential.
SECTION 4. Section 8, chapter 298, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 8. (1) The total amount of potential tax credits for all qualified semiconductor companies
in this state may not, at the time of certification under [section 4 of this 2023 Act] ORS 315.522,
exceed[:]
[(1)] $35 million for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023[;].
(2) The total amount of potential tax credits for all qualified companies in this state may
not, at the time of certification under ORS 315.522, exceed:
[(2)] (a) [$80] $160 million for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025;
[(3)] (b) [$90] $180 million for the biennium beginning July 1, 2027; and
[(4)] (c) [$50] $100 million for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2029.
SECTION 5. Section 12, chapter 298, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 12. [Sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act] ORS 315.518 to 315.522 and section 5, chapter 298,
Oregon Laws 2023, apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January
1, [2030] 2036.
SECTION 6. The amendments to ORS 315.518, 315.519 and 315.522 by sections 1 to 3 of this
2026 Act apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 7. (1) The governing body of a city or county may establish by ordinance or
resolution a property tax exemption for new or modernized machinery and equipment used
exclusively within the boundaries of the city or the unincorporated areas of the county, re-
spectively, by an advanced manufacturing business.
(2) An ordinance or resolution adopted under this section shall specify the requirements
for the machinery and equipment to be eligible for, and an advanced manufacturing business
to claim, the exemption.
(3)(a) An ordinance or resolution adopted under this section shall specify the period, not
to exceed five years, for which the exemption may be granted.
(b) The city or county may adopt any other provisions relating to the property tax ex-
emption that do not conflict with the requirements of this section.
(4)(a) The city or county may amend or repeal an ordinance or resolution adopted under
this section at any time.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, machinery and equipment that is
receiving an exemption under this section when the amendments to or the repeal of the or-
dinance or resolution become effective shall continue to receive the exemption pursuant to
the provisions of the ordinance or resolution in effect when the machinery and equipment
was initially granted the exemption.
SECTION 8. ORS 285C.175 is amended to read:
285C.175. (1) Property of an authorized business firm is exempt from ad valorem property taxa-
[4]

SB 1586
tion if:
(a) The property is qualified property under ORS 285C.180;
(b) The firm meets the qualifications under ORS 285C.200; and
(c) The firm has entered into a first-source hiring agreement under ORS 285C.215.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 285C.203:
(A) The exemption allowed under this section applies to the first tax year for which, as of Jan-
uary 1 preceding the tax year, the qualified property is in service. The exemption shall continue for
the next two succeeding tax years if the property continues to be owned or leased by the business
firm and located in the enterprise zone.
(B) The property may be exempt from property taxation under this section for up to [two] seven
additional tax years consecutively following the tax years described in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph, if authorized by the written agreement entered into by the firm and the sponsor under
ORS 285C.160.
(b) If qualified property of a qualified business firm is sold or leased to an eligible business firm
in the enterprise zone during the period the property is exempt under this section, the purchasing
or leasing firm is eligible to continue the exemption of the selling or leasing firm for the balance
of the exemption period, but only if any effects on employment within the zone that result from the
sale or lease do not constitute substantial curtailment under ORS 285C.210.
(3)(a) The exemption allowed under this section shall be 100 percent of the assessed value of the
qualified property in each of the tax years for which the exemption is available.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) If the qualified property is an addition to or modification of an existing building or structure,
the exemption shall be measured by the increase in value, if any, attributable to the addition or
modification.
(B) If the qualified property is an item of reconditioned, refurbished, retrofitted or upgraded real
property machinery or equipment, the exemption shall be measured by the increase in the value of
the item that is attributable to the reconditioning, refurbishment, retrofitting or upgrade.
(4)(a) An exemption may not be granted under this section for qualified property assessed for
property tax purposes in the county in which the property is located on or before the date on which:
(A) Designation of the zone takes effect under ORS 285C.074; or
(B) A boundary change for the zone takes effect under ORS 285C.117 if the property is located
in an area added to the zone.
(b) An exemption may not be granted for qualified property constructed, added, modified or in-
stalled in the zone or in the process of construction, addition, modification or installation in the
zone on or before the date on which:
(A) Designation of the zone takes effect under ORS 285C.074; or
(B) A boundary change for the zone takes effect under ORS 285C.117 if the property is located
in an area added to the zone.
(c) An exemption may not be granted for any qualified property that was in service within the
zone for more than 12 months by January 1 of the first assessment year for which an exemption
claim is made, or 24 months, in the case of a late claim under ORS 285C.220 (9).
(d) An exemption may not be granted for any qualified property unless the property is actually
in use or occupancy before July 1 of the year immediately following the year during which the
property was first placed in service.
(e) Except as provided in ORS 285C.245, an exemption may not be granted for qualified property
[5]

SB 1586
constructed, added, modified or installed after termination of an enterprise zone.
(5) Property is not required to have been exempt under ORS 285C.170 in order to be exempt
under this section.
(6) The county assessor shall notify the business firm in writing whenever property is denied
an exemption under this section. The denial of exemption may be appealed to the Oregon Tax Court
under ORS 305.404 to 305.560.
(7) For each tax year that the property is exempt from taxation, the assessor shall:
(a) Enter on the assessment roll, as a notation, the assessed value of the property as if it were
not exempt under this section.
(b) Enter on the assessment roll, as a notation, the amount of additional taxes that would be
due if the property were not exempt.
(c) Indicate on the assessment roll that the property is exempt and is subject to potential addi-
tional taxes as provided in ORS 285C.240, by adding the notation “enterprise zone exemption (po-
tential additional tax).”
SECTION 9. ORS 285C.160 is amended to read:
285C.160. (1) An eligible business firm seeking authorization under ORS 285C.140 and the spon-
sor of the enterprise zone in which the firm intends to invest may enter into a written agreement
to extend the period during which the qualified property is exempt from taxation under ORS
285C.175 if the firm complies with the terms of the agreement.
(2) The period for which the qualified property is to continue to be exempt must be set forth in
the agreement and may not exceed [two] seven additional tax years for which a school support fee
must be paid in accordance with ORS 285C.162.
(3) In order for an agreement under this section to extend the period of exemption, the agree-
ment must be executed on or before the date on which the firm is authorized, and:
(a) If the enterprise zone is a rural enterprise zone or an urban enterprise zone located inside
a metropolitan statistical area of fewer than 400,000 residents, the agreement must require that the
firm:
(A)(i) Annually compensate all new employees hired by the firm at an average rate of at least
150 percent of the county average annual wage for each assessment year during the tax exemption
period, as determined at the time of authorization; or
(ii) If the enterprise zone is located in a qualified rural county, annually compensate all new
employees hired by the firm at an average rate of at least 130 percent of the county average annual
wage for each assessment year during the tax exemption period, as determined at the time of au-
thorization; and
(B) Meet any additional requirement that the sponsor may reasonably request.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection, the average wage received by the newly
hired employees must equal or exceed 100 percent of the average wage in the county.
(c) If the enterprise zone is an urban enterprise zone located inside a metropolitan statistical
area of 400,000 residents or more, the agreement must require that the firm meet any additional
requirement the sponsor may reasonably require.
(4) If a firm enters into an agreement under this section that includes a compensation require-
ment under subsection (3)(a)(A) of this section and the firm subsequently submits one or more
statements of continued intent under ORS 285C.165, notwithstanding the terms of the agreement
made under this section, for each statement of continued intent submitted, the county average an-
nual wage under subsection (3)(a)(A) of this section shall be adjusted to a level that is current with
[6]

SB 1586
the statement.
SECTION 10. ORS 285C.162 is amended to read:
285C.162. (1) As used in this section:[,]
(a) “Affected school district” means a school district as defined in ORS 332.002 (2) in which the
qualified property of a business firm granted exemption under ORS 285C.175 is located.
(b) “Electing school district” means an affected school district whose governing body
elects to receive a school support fee under this section.
(2)(a) An agreement entered into under ORS 285C.160 by the governing body of a zone sponsor
and a business firm [shall] may provide for a school support fee to be paid in lieu of the property
taxes that would otherwise be imposed on the business firm’s qualified property.
(b) The governing body of an affected school district shall notify the zone sponsor
whether or not the school district elects to receive a school support fee.
[(b)] (3)(a) The amount of [the] a school support fee [of each affected] for an electing school
district shall equal the respective rate set under ORS 285C.067 (1)(b) multiplied by the property
taxes that would, but for the exemption, be due on the qualified property for each property tax year
to which the agreement relates.
[(c)] (b) The agreement may also include:
(A) A rate of interest and a penalty to be imposed on delinquent fee payments;
(B) A means and schedule for curing a delinquent fee payment; and
(C) Any other provisions the zone sponsor and business firm agree upon that do not conflict with
this section.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a) On or before November 1 following the beginning of each of the [two] additional
tax years agreed upon under ORS 285C.160 (2), the governing body of the zone sponsor shall provide
to the governing body of each [affected] electing school district all information necessary for the
[affected] electing school district to collect the fee directly from the business firm.
(b) On or before each following December 1, the governing body of each [affected] electing
school district shall send to the business firm a notice of the required fee payment. The fee shall
be due not later than December 31 of the same year.
[(4)] (5) Each [affected] electing school district shall be responsible for making refunds to busi-
ness firms of overpayments of the district’s school support fee and any interest or penalty imposed
on the fee.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a) If a fee payment is delinquent for more than 60 days following the date of delin-
quency or any later date allowed for curing the delinquency, the governing body of each [affected]
electing school district shall give written notice of the delinquency to the business firm and the
assessor of the county in which the [affected] electing school district is situated.
(b) Upon receipt of the written notice under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the assessor shall:
(A) Disqualify the property for the property tax years, if any, for which exemption under ORS
285C.175 would otherwise be allowable following the disqualifying event; and
(B) Impose the amount of the outstanding fee along with any amounts of interest or penalty
imposed on the fee.
[(6)] (7) The amount determined to be due under subsection [(5)] (6) of this section:
(a) May be paid to the tax collector before completion of the next general property tax roll
pursuant to ORS 311.370; and
(b) Shall be added to the tax extended against the property on the next general property tax roll.
[(7)] (8) Amounts collected under this section shall be deemed to have been imposed for the
[7]

SB 1586
property tax year to which the fee payment relates.
[(8)] (9) The fee shall be considered moneys received in lieu of property taxes for purposes of
ORS 327.011 (1)(f).
[(9)] (10) The amount of a fee and any interest or penalty imposed on the fee, and the disquali-
fication of qualified property under this section, may be appealed to the Oregon Tax Court under
ORS 305.404 to 305.560.
SECTION 11. ORS 285C.405 is amended to read:
285C.405. (1) As used in this section:[,]
(a) “Affected school district” means a school district as defined in ORS 332.002 (2) in which the
facility of a business firm granted exemption under ORS 285C.409 is located.
(b) “Electing school district” means an affected school district whose governing body
elects to receive a school support fee under this section.
(2)(a) An agreement entered into under ORS 285C.403 by the governing body of a zone sponsor
and a business firm [shall] may provide for a school support fee to be paid in lieu of the property
taxes that would otherwise be imposed on the business firm’s facility for each year of exemption
after the fifth year.
(b) The governing body of an affected school district shall notify the zone sponsor
whether or not the school district elects to receive a school support fee.
[(b)] (3)(a) The amount of [the] a school support fee [of each affected] for an electing school
district shall equal the respective rate set under ORS 285C.067 (1)(b) multiplied by the property
taxes that would, but for the exemption, be due on the facility for each property tax year after the
fifth year of exemption.
[(c)] (b) The agreement may also include:
(A) A rate of interest and a penalty to be imposed on delinquent fee payments;
(B) A means and schedule for curing a delinquent fee payment; and
(C) Any other provisions the zone sponsor and business firm agree upon that do not conflict with
this section.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a) On or before November 1 following the beginning of the sixth and each subsequent
property tax year for which an exemption under ORS 285C.409 is granted, the governing body of the
zone sponsor shall provide to the governing body of each [affected] electing school district all in-
formation necessary for the [affected] electing school district to collect the fee directly from the
business firm.
(b) On or before each following December 1, the governing body of each [affected] electing
school district shall send to the business firm a notice of the required fee payment. The fee shall
be due not later than December 31 of the same year.
[(4)] (5) Each [affected] electing school district shall be responsible for making refunds to busi-
ness firms of overpayments of the district’s school support fee and any interest or penalty imposed
on the fee.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a) If a fee payment is delinquent for more than 60 days following the date of delin-
quency or any later date allowed for curing the delinquency, the governing body of each [affected]
electing school district shall give written notice of the delinquency to the business firm and the
assessor of the county in which the [affected] electing school district is situated.
(b) Upon receipt of the written notice under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the assessor shall:
(A) Disqualify the property for the property tax years, if any, for which exemption under ORS
285C.409 would otherwise be allowable following the disqualifying event; and
[8]

SB 1586
(B) Impose the amount of the outstanding fee along with any amounts of interest or penalty
imposed on the fee.
[(6)] (7) The amount determined to be due under subsection [(5)] (6) of this section:
(a) May be paid to the tax collector before completion of the next general property tax roll
pursuant to ORS 311.370; and
(b) Shall be added to the tax extended against the property on the next general property tax roll.
[(7)] (8) Amounts collected under this section shall be deemed to have been imposed for the
property tax year to which the fee payment relates.
[(8)] (9) The fee shall be considered moneys received in lieu of property taxes for purposes of
ORS 327.011 (1)(f).
[(9)] (10) The amount of a fee and any interest or penalty imposed on the fee, and the disquali-
fication of a facility under this section, may be appealed to the Oregon Tax Court under ORS 305.404
to 305.560.
SECTION 12. ORS 285C.067 is amended to read:
285C.067. (1) Prior to designating an enterprise zone under ORS 285C.065 or 285C.250:
(a) The governing body of the city, county or port seeking to designate the enterprise zone shall
consult with all local taxing districts with territory in the zone.
(b) The governing bodies of the zone sponsor and each electing school district as defined in ORS
[332.002 (2)] 285C.162 with territory in the enterprise zone shall set a rate for the school support fee
imposed pursuant to ORS 285C.162 [(2)] (3) and 285C.405 [(2)] (3) that is at least 15 percent and not
more than 30 percent. The rate shall apply to all qualified property and facilities granted exemption
under ORS 285C.175 or 285C.409, respectively, located in the enterprise zone.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department may adopt rules on the consultations re-
quired under subsection (1) of this section and procedures related to the consultations.
SECTION 13. ORS 285C.403 is amended to read:
285C.403. (1)(a) A business firm proposing to apply for the tax exemption provided under ORS
285C.409 shall, before the commencement of construction or installation of property or improvements
at a location in a rural enterprise zone and before the hiring of employees, apply for certification
with the sponsor of the zone and with the county assessor of the county or counties in which the
zone is located.
(b) A business firm may not be certified under this section if it is significantly engaged in op-
erating a fulfillment center within the rural enterprise zone from which deliveries are made to retail
purchasers within, or in the region surrounding, the rural enterprise zone.
(2) An application for certification shall be made on a form prescribed by the Department of
Revenue and shall contain the following information:
(a) A description of the firm’s proposed business operations and facility in the rural enterprise
zone;
(b) A description and estimated cost or value of the property or improvements to be constructed
or installed at the facility;
(c) An estimate of the number of employees at the facility that will be hired by the firm;
(d) A commitment to meet the applicable requirements of ORS 285C.412;
(e) A commitment to satisfy all additional conditions agreed to pursuant to the written agree-
ment between the rural enterprise zone sponsor and the business firm under subsection (3)(c) of this
section; and
(f) Any other information considered necessary by the Department of Revenue.
[9]

SB 1586
(3) The sponsor and the county assessor shall certify the business firm by approving the appli-
cation if the sponsor and the county assessor determine that all of the following requirements have
been met:
(a) The governing body of the county and city in which the facility is located has adopted a
resolution approving the property tax exemption for the facility.
(b) The business firm has committed to meet the applicable requirements of ORS 285C.412.
(c) The business firm has entered into a written agreement with the sponsor of the rural enter-
prise zone that conforms to subsection (4) of this section.
(d) When the written agreement required under paragraph (c) of this subsection is executed, the
facility is located in:
(A) A qualified rural county; or
(B) A county with chronically low income or chronic unemployment, based on the most recently
revised annual data available.
(4)(a)(A) The written agreement required under subsection (3)(c) of this section shall state the
number of consecutive tax years for which the facility, following commencement of operations, is to
be exempt from property tax under ORS 285C.409.
(B) The agreement may not provide for a period of exemption that is less than seven consecutive
tax years or more than 15 consecutive tax years.
(C) If the agreement is silent on the number of tax years for which the facility is to be exempt
following placement in service, the exemption shall be for seven consecutive tax years.
(b) The agreement must [require a] include any school support fee to be paid in accordance with
ORS 285C.405.
(c) The agreement may include any additional requirements that the sponsor may reasonably
request, including but not limited to contributions for local services or infrastructure benefiting the
facility.
(5) The approval of an application by both the sponsor and the county assessor under subsection
(3) of this section shall be prima facie evidence that the business firm will qualify for the property
tax exemption under ORS 285C.409.
(6) The sponsor and the county assessor shall provide copies of an approved application to the
applicant, the Department of Revenue and the Oregon Business Development Department.
(7) If the sponsor or the county assessor fails or refuses to certify the business firm, the business
firm may appeal to the Oregon Tax Court under ORS 305.404 to 305.560. The business firm shall
provide copies of the firm’s appeal to the sponsor, the county assessor, the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department and the Department of Revenue.
SECTION 14. ORS 285B.626 is amended to read:
285B.626. As used in ORS 285B.625 to 285B.632:
(1)(a) “Eligible employer” means an employer that[:]
[(a)] is conducting a traded sector business on a regionally significant industrial site[;] and that
meets the requirements under paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection.
(b)[(A)] With respect to [the] an employer’s establishment at a rural regionally significant in-
dustrial site, [has increased] the employer must:
(A) Be conducting business at a site where, together with all other eligible employers
conducting business at the same site, the cumulative average annual employment has in-
creased by at least 25 jobs; and
(B) [has] Have an average annual wage of at least 150 percent of the county or state average
[10]

SB 1586
wage, whichever is less.[; or]
[(B)] (c) With respect to [the] an employer’s establishment at an urban regionally significant
industrial site, [has increased] the employer must:
(A) Be conducting business at a site where, together with all other eligible employers
conducting business at the same site, the cumulative average annual employment has in-
creased by at least 50 jobs; and
(B) [has] Have an average annual wage of at least 150 percent of the county or state average
wage, whichever is less.
(2) “Estimated incremental income tax revenues” means the Oregon personal income tax reven-
ues that are equivalent to the amount of tax that employees of an eligible employer who are hired
by the eligible employer on a designated regionally significant industrial site have paid under ORS
chapter 316 in the tax years following the first tax year in which the eligible employer begins con-
ducting a traded sector business on the designated regionally significant industrial site.
(3) “Industrial use” means employment activities, including but not limited to manufacturing,
assembly, fabrication, processing, storage, logistics, warehousing, importation, distribution, trans-
shipment and research and development, that generate income from the production, handling or
distribution of goods or services, including goods or services in the traded sector.
(4) “Project sponsor” means:
(a) A public owner of a regionally significant industrial site that is investing in preparation of
the site for industrial use by a third party; or
(b) A public entity that has entered into a development or other agreement with the private
owner of a regionally significant industrial site to prepare the site for industrial use.
(5) “Regionally significant industrial site” means a site planned and zoned for industrial use
that:
(a)(A) Is suitable for the location of new industrial uses or the expansion of existing industrial
uses and that can provide significant additional employment in the region;
(B) Has site characteristics that provide significant competitive advantages that are difficult or
impossible to replicate in the region; and
(C) Has superior access to transportation and freight infrastructure, including but not limited
to rail, port, airport, multimodal freight or transshipment facilities and other major transportation
facilities or routes; or
(b) Is located in an area designated by Metro, as defined in ORS 197.015, as a regionally sig-
nificant industrial area.
(6) “Rural site” means a regionally significant industrial site located in an area outside of a
metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the most recent federal decennial census.
(7) “Traded sector” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285A.010.
(8) “Urban site” means a regionally significant industrial site located in a metropolitan statis-
tical area, as defined by the most recent federal decennial census, that is located inside a regional
or metropolitan urban growth boundary.
(9) “Wage” has the meaning given that term pursuant to rules adopted by the Oregon Business
Development Department.
SECTION 15. Sections 16 and 17 of this 2026 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 183.
SECTION 16. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Agency” means:
[11]

SB 1586
(A) The Department of Environmental Quality.
(B) The State Department of Agriculture.
(C) The Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(D) The Department of Transportation.
(E) The Water Resources Department.
(F) The State Department of Energy.
(b) “Permit” has the meaning given that term in ORS 183.700.
(2) An agency shall establish efficient deadlines within which the agency intends to pro-
cess applications for each permit issued by the agency. The agency shall make the deadlines
available to the public.
(3) To the greatest extent possible, an agency that fails to process an application for a
permit before the deadline established under this section shall refund the application fee for
the permit and finish processing the application.
(4) This section does not confer any right to challenge a rule, order, outcome of a permit
application or other action or inaction of an agency.
SECTION 17. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Agency” means:
(A) The Department of Environmental Quality.
(B) The State Department of Agriculture.
(C) The Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(D) The Department of Transportation.
(E) The Water Resources Department.
(F) The State Department of Energy.
(b) “Complete application” means an application for which the applicant has properly and
timely submitted all information required by an agency to act upon the application.
(c) “Permit” has the meaning given that term in ORS 183.700.
(2) No later than 60 days following the effective date of this 2026 Act, an agency shall
publish a catalog of permits issued by the agency. For each permit issued by the agency, the
catalog must include:
(a) A description of the permit.
(b) The duration of the permit.
(c) The statutory authority, regulatory authority or other authority for issuing the per-
mit.
(d) The method by which the agency receives applications for the permit and, if readily
available, the date the method was last significantly updated.
(e) Any statutory, regulatory or other authority governing the time within which the
agency must process applications for the permit.
(f) The application fee for the permit, the statutory, regulatory or other authority for the
application fee and when the amount of the application fee was last changed.
(g) An analysis of the time within which, with existing resources, the agency could con-
sistently process complete applications for the permit.
(h) A description of the steps in the current approval process, as well as any post-
approval steps that must be completed before a person can use the permit.
(i) For the year 2025:
(A) The number of applications received for the permit.
[12]

SB 1586
(B) The average processing time for all applications for the permit, including applications
that were initially incomplete.
(C) The average processing time for complete applications for the permit.
(D) The average time between approval of the permit and any necessary post-approval
step.
(j) An analysis identifying opportunities to streamline the approval process for the per-
mit, eliminate any unnecessary steps or barriers, reduce the incidence of incomplete appli-
cations and eliminate any obsolete or unnecessary approval processes.
(k) The approximate number of applications for the permit currently pending at the
agency and a statement of whether a backlog exists.
SECTION 18. Section 17 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 19. ORS 197A.250 is amended to read:
197A.250. (1) For purposes of land use planning in Oregon, the Legislative Assembly designates
the land in Washington County that was designated as rural reserve in Metro Resolution No.
11-4245, adopted on March 15, 2011, as the acknowledged rural reserve in Washington County, ex-
cept that:
(a) The Legislative Assembly does not designate as rural reserves the real property in Area 5C
on Metro’s map denominated as the “Urban and Rural Reserves in Washington County, Attachment
A to Staff Report for Resolution No. 11-4245 (03/17/11 DRAFT),” that is more particularly described
as:
(A) Tax lots 1500 and 1501, section 1 of township 2 south, range 2 west, Willamette Meridian;
and
(B) A tract of land being in the north one-half of section 18, township 2 south, range 1 west,
Willamette Meridian, Washington County Oregon, and being more particularly described as follows:
Beginning at the northeast corner of that tract of land conveyed to John Lasich, et ux, by deed re-
corded October 22, 1931, in Book 148, page 116, of the Washington County Deed Records; thence
westerly along the north line said tract 1444.2 feet, more or less, to the southwest corner of that
property described in Deed Document No. 81038291 of the Washington County Book of Records;
thence southerly and perpendicular to said north line, 50.00 feet; thence easterly on a line being
parallel with and 50.00 feet southerly of said north line 1444.2 feet, more or less, to the east line
of said Lasich tract; thence northerly 50.00 feet to the point of beginning.
(b) The Legislative Assembly designates as acknowledged urban reserve the real property that
is part of the original plat of Bendemeer, Washington County, Oregon, more particularly described
as:
(A) All of lots 1 through 18, inclusive;
(B) The parts of lots 64, 65 and 66 that are situated between the east boundary of the right of
way of Northwest West Union Road and the east boundary of the right of way of Northwest
Cornelius Pass Road;
(C) The real property that is more particularly described as: Beginning at a point of origin that
is the south bank of Holcomb Creek and the west boundary of the right of way of Northwest
Cornelius Pass Road; thence easterly along the south bank of Holcomb Creek, continuing along the
south bank of Holcomb Lake to its intersection with the west boundary of Area 8C; thence southerly
along the west boundary of Area 8C to its intersection with the north boundary of the right of way
of Northwest West Union Road; thence westerly along the right of way to its intersection with the
west boundary of the right of way of Northwest Cornelius Pass Road; thence northerly along the
[13]

SB 1586
right of way to the point of origin;
(D) The real property that is more particularly described as tax lot 4050 in section 14A of
township 1 north, range 2 west, Willamette Meridian;
(E) The portion of Northwest West Union Road and its right of way from the intersection of the
road with the west boundary of Area 8C to the intersection of the road with the west boundary of
the right of way of Northwest Bendemeer Road on Metro’s map denominated as the “Urban and
Rural Reserves in Washington County, Attachment A to Staff Report for Resolution No. 11-4245
(03/17/11 DRAFT)”; and
(F) The real property that is more particularly described as tax lot 400 in section 14D of town-
ship 1 north, range 2 west, Willamette Meridian.
(2) For purposes of land use planning in Oregon, the Legislative Assembly designates the land
in Washington County that was designated as urban reserve in Metro Resolution No. 11-4245,
adopted on March 15, 2011, as the acknowledged urban reserve in Washington County, except that:
(a) The real property in Area 8A on Metro’s map denominated as the “Urban and Rural Re-
serves in Washington County, Attachment A to Staff Report for Resolution No. 11-4245 (03/17/11
DRAFT),” [east of the east boundary of the right of way of Northwest Jackson School Road and east
of the east bank of Storey Creek and the east bank of Waibel Creek] is included within the acknowl-
edged Metro urban growth boundary.
[(b) The real property in Area 8A on Metro’s map denominated as the “Urban and Rural Reserves
in Washington County, Attachment A to Staff Report for Resolution No. 11-4245 (03/17/11 DRAFT),”
that is south of the south boundary of the right of way of Highway 26 and west of the real property
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection is designated as acknowledged rural reserve.]
[(c)] (b) The real property in Area 8B on Metro’s map denominated as the “Urban and Rural
Reserves in Washington County, Attachment A to Staff Report for Resolution No. 11-4245 (03/17/11
DRAFT),” that is more particularly described as tax lot 100 in section 21AA of township 1 north,
range 2 west, Willamette Meridian, and tax lots 900, 901, 1100, 1200, 1300 and 1400 in section 15 of
township 1 north, range 2 west, Willamette Meridian, is not designated as a reserve area.
[(d)] (c) The real property in Area 8B on Metro’s map denominated as the “Urban and Rural
Reserves in Washington County, Attachment A to Staff Report for Resolution No. 11-4245 (03/17/11
DRAFT),” that is not described in paragraph [(c)] (b) of this subsection is designated as acknowl-
edged rural reserve.
[(e)] (d) The real property in Area 7B on Metro’s map denominated as the “Urban and Rural
Reserves in Washington County, Attachment A to Staff Report for Resolution No. 11-4245 (03/17/11
DRAFT),” that is north of the south bank of Council Creek is designated as acknowledged rural
reserve.
[(f)] (e) The real property in Area 7B on Metro’s map denominated as the “Urban and Rural
Reserves in Washington County, Attachment A to Staff Report for Resolution No. 11-4245 (03/17/11
DRAFT),” that is south of the south bank of Council Creek is included within the acknowledged
Metro urban growth boundary.
(3) For purposes of land use planning in Oregon, in relation to the following real property in
Washington County that is not reserved by designation in Metro Resolution No. 11-4245, adopted
on March 15, 2011, the Legislative Assembly designates:
(a) As acknowledged rural reserve the real property that is situated south of the City of North
Plains on Metro’s map denominated as the “Urban and Rural Reserves in Washington County, At-
tachment A to Staff Report for Resolution No. 11-4245 (03/17/11 DRAFT),” more particularly de-
[14]

SB 1586
scribed as tax lots 100, 101, 200 and 201 in section 11 of township 1 north, range 3 west, Willamette
Meridian, tax lots 1800 and 2000 and that portion of tax lot 3900 that is north of the south line of
the Dobbins Donation Land Claim No. 47 in section 12 of township 1 north, range 3 west, Willamette
Meridian, and the portion of Northwest Gordon Road and its right of way from the south boundary
of the right of way of Northwest Beach Road to the south boundary of tax lot 200 in section 11 of
township 1 north, range 3 west, Willamette Meridian.
(b) As acknowledged rural reserve the real property that is situated north of the City of
Cornelius on Metro’s map denominated as the “Urban and Rural Reserves in Washington County,
Attachment A to Staff Report for Resolution No. 11-4245 (03/17/11 DRAFT),” and that is north of the
south bank of Council Creek, east of the east right of way of Northwest Cornelius-Schefflin Road
and west of the west bank of Dairy Creek.
(c) As acknowledged rural reserve the real property that is north of the City of Forest Grove
on Metro’s map denominated as the “Urban and Rural Reserves in Washington County, Attachment
A to Staff Report for Resolution No. 11-4245 (03/17/11 DRAFT),” more particularly described as east
of Area 7B, west of the east right of way of Highway 47 and south of the north right of way of
Northwest Purdin Road.
(d) As acknowledged rural reserve the real property that is situated west of Area 8B on Metro’s
map denominated as the “Urban and Rural Reserves in Washington County, Attachment A to Staff
Report for Resolution No. 11-4245 (03/17/11 DRAFT).”
(4) Land in a county in Metro that is planned and zoned for farm, forest or mixed farm and
forest use and that is not designated as urban reserve may not be included within the urban growth
boundary of Metro before at least 75 percent of the land in the county that was designated urban
reserve in this section has been included within the urban growth boundary and planned and zoned
for urban uses.
(5) The real property described in subsection (2)(a) of this section east of Northwest Jackson
School Road, Storey Creek and Waibel Creek, except for the land denominated as “UGB 2014”
on the Metro Map titled “HB 4078 Reserves and Urban Growth Boundary Washington County Area
- Attachment 1 (June 2014)” and that is south of Northwest Sunset Highway and north of Northwest
Evergreen Road:
(a) Is employment land of state significance; and
(b) Must be planned and zoned for employment use.
(6) The real property described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, except for the land
east of Northwest Jackson School Road, Storey Creek and Waibel Creek:
(a) Must be planned and zoned for industrial use, including:
(A) High-technology and advanced manufacturing and production, including research and
development;
(B) Uses that support high-technology and advanced manufacturing, research and devel-
opment; and
(C) Commercial uses that are accessory to and located within the same building as the
high-technology and advanced manufacturing or that support the manufacturing.
(b) May not zoned for or developed as:
(A) A data storage, processing or information center except as an accessory to or part
of a use described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(B) Commercial recreation facilities; or
(C) Retail warehousing facilities.
[15]

SB 1586
[(6)] (7) If the real property described in subsection [(2)(f)] (2)(e) of this section or ORS 197A.358
(1) to (3) is planned and zoned for employment use, in its first legislative review of the urban growth
boundary on or after April 1, 2014, Metro shall not count the employment capacity of the real
property described in subsection [(2)(f)] (2)(e) of this section or in ORS 197A.358 (1) to (3) in deter-
mining the employment capacity of the land within Metro.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding ORS chapter 197 or 197A, ORS 215.431 or 227.188, any
statewide land use planning goals or administrative rules that implement the goals, not later
than six months following the effective date of this 2026 Act, Washington County and the
City of Hillsboro shall amend their respective comprehensive plans and land use regulations
to allow for the use of the land described in ORS 197A.250 (2)(a) for the uses described in
197A.250 (6). The amendments are deemed acknowledged under ORS 197.251 upon adoption
by the local government, provided that:
(1) Each amendment is adopted by an ordinance or resolution of the governing body of
the local government after a public hearing; and
(2) A copy of the ordinance or resolution is delivered to the Land Conservation and De-
velopment Commission within 14 days after adoption.
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any provision of ORS chapter 198 or 268, the lands added
to the acknowledged Metro urban growth boundary by the amendments to ORS 197A.250 by
section 19 of this 2026 Act are hereby annexed to the metropolitan service district without
further proceedings.
SECTION 22. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

[16]